Missouri, session 2026, HB1806.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 571, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 571.034, to read as follows:
571.034. 1. A person under eighteen years of age commits the offense of
unlawful use of a firearm by a minor if such person knowingly carries concealed upon
or about his or her person a firearm.
2. The offense of unlawful use of a firearm by a minor is a class D misdemeanor.
3. Upon conviction or a plea of guilty for an offense under this section, the court
shall order the immediate confiscation of the firearm. The court may issue any other
order allowed under section 571.095 in felony cases, and the procedures outlined in
section 571.095 shall apply.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.